Tennessee statutes. Title 64 Regional Authorities
Part 3

Composition of Metropolitan Planning Organization's Policy Board

64-8-301. Composition of metropolitan planning organization's policy board.

Each metropolitan planning organization's policy board shall ensure that one (1) voting member who resides within the metropolitan planning organization's boundaries is chosen in consultation with the Tennessee County Highway Officials Association to represent county highway departments operating within the planning area.

Acts 2015, ch. 479, § 1; 2018, ch. 659, § 1.

Compiler's Note. Acts 2015, ch. 479, § 1 enacted this part with one section. By authority of the Code Commission, the section was codified as multiple sections. Subsection (a) was codified as §64-8-301, subsection (b) was codified as § 64-8-302 and Acts 2015, ch. 479, § 2 , which was previously uncodified, has been codified as §64-8-303.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment rewrote the section which read; “Each metropolitan planning organization's policy board shall ensure that:“(1) The number of votes for any local government official shall be equally weighted and shall not be based on the population of the area represented by each official; and“(2) One (1) voting member who resides within the metropolitan planning organization's boundaries shall be chosen by the Tennessee County Highway Officials Association.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 659, § 2. April 9, 2018.

64-8-302. Part definitions.

For purposes of this part:

“Local government official” means the elected officials representing any county, municipal, or metropolitan government located within the boundaries of a metropolitan planning organization; and

“Metropolitan planning organization” means an agency that is designated or redesignated by a memorandum of understanding as a metropolitan planning organization in accordance with 23 U.S.C. § 134; provided, that the boundaries of the metropolitan planning organization are located entirely within this state; provided further, that the metropolitan planning organization contains not less than three (3) counties located within this state.

Acts 2015, ch. 479, § 1.

Compiler's Note. Acts 2015, ch. 479, § 1 enacted this part with one section. By authority of the Code Commission, the section was codified as multiple sections. Subsection (a) was codified as §64-8-301, subsection (b) was codified as § 64-8-302 and Acts 2015, ch. 479, § 2 , which was previously uncodified, has been codified as §64-8-303.

64-8-303. Construction with federal law.

This part is intended to supplement 23 U.S.C. § 134. In the event any provision of this part is deemed inconsistent with the requirements of 23 U.S.C. § 134, the federal law shall control.

Acts 2015, ch. 479, § 2.

Compiler's Note. Acts 2015, ch. 479, § 1 enacted this part with one section. By authority of the Code Commission, the section was codified as multiple sections. Subsection (a) was codified as §64-8-301, subsection (b) was codified as § 64-8-302 and Acts 2015, ch. 479, § 2 , which was previously uncodified, has been codified as §64-8-303.